Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-628.04
Benefits; disqualification; alien.

(1) An individual shall be disqualified for unemployment benefits for any week if the services upon which such benefits are based are performed by an alien. This section shall apply unless such alien:

(a) Is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time such services were performed;

(b) Was lawfully present for purposes of performing such services; or

(c) Was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time such services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. 1182(d)(5).

(2) Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits. In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of his or her alien status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

Laws 2017, LB172, § 34.